Hawaii statutes.
§386-129 Employees not to pay for
insurance; penalty. No agreement by an employee to pay any portion of the
premium paid by the employee's employer, or to contribute to a benefit fund or
department maintained by the employer, or to the cost of mutual or other
insurance maintained for or carried for the purpose of securing compensation as
herein required, shall be valid; and any employer who makes a deduction for
that purpose from the wages or salary of any employee entitled to the benefits
of this chapter shall be fined not more than $5,000. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1;
Supp, §97-128; HRS §386-129; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 37, §6; am L 2016, c
187, §5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next